Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 7. Penalties

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d Unemployment Compensation §§ 223, 224.

§ 27-3-701.
Financing of contributions or waiver of rights by employees.

No employer shall directly or indirectly make, require or accept any deduction from wages or payments by employees to finance contributions required by this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

] or require or accept any waiver of an employee’s right under this act. Any employer or his officer or agent violating this section shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each violation is a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 54-115; W.S. 1957, § 27-36; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-116; Laws 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-702.
Obtaining benefits by fraud; disqualification of benefits; penalties.

No person shall, for himself or any other person, knowingly make a false statement or misrepresentation or knowingly fail to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase benefits or other payments under this act or other state or federal law. Any person violating this section is guilty of:

A misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both, if the amount of benefits obtained in violation of this section is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00); or

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both, if the amount of benefits obtained under fraud is one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or greater.

Upon conviction the court shall require the defendant to make restitution to the department in the amount of benefits or other payments improperly paid due to the defendant’s fraud. Each false statement, misrepresentation or failure to disclose a material fact is a separate offense. This section shall not preclude prosecution under any other applicable law.

In addition to the penalties provided by this section, a person convicted under this section or any other applicable law shall be disqualified from receiving benefits in any week beginning within a two (2) year period immediately following conviction.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 16; 1941, ch. 96, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 54-116; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 27-37; Laws 1969, ch. 60, § 3; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-117; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1993, ch. 76, § 1; 2004, ch. 126, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(i) and (ii), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Cited

in

Judge v. Dep't of Empl., 2002 WY 109, 50 P.3d 686,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability for wrongfully obtaining unemployment benefits, 80 ALR3d 1280.

§ 27-3-703.
Fraud by employing unit; refusal to furnish reports; failure to make required payments; failure to comply with injunction order; penalties.

No officer, agent or any other individual of an employing unit shall knowingly make a false statement or misrepresentation or knowingly fail to disclose a material fact with the intention of preventing or reducing the payment of benefits to any entitled individual, to avoid being subject to this act or to avoid or reduce any contribution or other payment required from an employing unit under this act, or willfully fail or refuse to make any contribution or other payment. Any such individual violating this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. Each false statement, misrepresentation or failure to disclose a material fact is a separate offense.

Any employing unit or if the employing unit is a corporation, any officer or director liable under W.S. 27-3-510(e), fraudulently failing to pay contributions required under this act for a period of two (2) or more consecutive calendar quarters or the total of which exceeds five hundred dollars ($500.00), is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

Any officer, agent or other individual of an employing unit who willfully refuses or fails to furnish any report or to produce or permit the inspection of records required by this act is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of any failure or refusal is a separate offense.

Any employing unit failing to comply with a court order issued pursuant to W.S. 27-3-502(h), or any partner or corporate officer of the employing unit aiding or assisting the employing unit in not complying with the court order, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

This section shall not preclude prosecution under any other applicable state law.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 16; 1941, ch. 96, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 54-116; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 27-37; Laws 1969, ch. 60, § 3; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-117; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1993, ch. 76, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-704.
General penalty.

Any person willfully violating this act or any order, rule or regulation under this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

] for which no specific penalty is provided is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned not more than sixty (60) days, or both. Each day of violation is a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 16; 1941, ch. 96, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 54-116; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 27-37; Laws 1969, ch. 60, § 3; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-117; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1984, ch. 50, § 2.

Cited in

Brock v. Wyo. ex rel. Wyo. Workforce Servs., Unemployment Ins. Div., 2017 WY 47, 394 P.3d 460,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 27-3-705.
Improper filing of claims; penalties.

An individual who knowingly and with the intent to defraud allows or authorizes another person to sign the individual’s name or use his personal identification number to make or file a claim for benefits on the individual’s behalf is subject to the penalties prescribed in W.S. 27-3-311(e) and 27-3-702(a).

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 27-3-706.
Experience rating manipulation; penalties.

A person who knowingly, or with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard of the true facts or the requirements of this act, violates or attempts to violate W.S.

27-3-507

or any other provision of this act related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate, or who knowingly advises another to violate the requirements of W.S.

27-3-507

or any other provision of this act related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate, shall be subject to the following penalties:

A person who is an employer shall be assigned, for the rate year during which the noncompliance or misrepresentation occurred and for the following three (3) rate years, the highest rate assignable under W.S.

27-3-503

. If the person’s business is already at the highest rate for any year, or if the amount of increase in the person’s rate would be less than two percent (2%) for that year, then a penalty rate of two percent (2%) of taxable wages shall be imposed for that year. This penalty may exceed the maximum assignable rate;

A person who is not an employer shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00). Funds received by the division under this paragraph shall be paid over to the state treasurer to be credited to the public school fund of the county in which the violation for which the penalty imposed occurred;

In addition to the penalty imposed pursuant to paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, any violation or attempted violation of W.S. 27-3-507 or any other provision of this act related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate may be prosecuted as a felony punishable by a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both. The fine under this paragraph shall be paid over to the state treasurer to be credited to the public school fund of the county in which the violation for which the penalty imposed occurred.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 186, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 186, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.